Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5606YH (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2263 Section 1. Section 225A.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 12A. âLife-altering challengeâ means a 3 major personal stressor or life event that is disruptive to an 4 individualâs well-being and daily life and that may result in 5 the need for crisis prevention. 6 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 225A.10 Peer-run respite programs. 7 1. The department shall establish seven peer-run respite 8 programs throughout the state, each of which must meet all of 9 the following requirements: 10 a. The program shall offer voluntary, short-term support for 11 individuals experiencing emotional distress, behavioral health 12 distress, a mental health crisis, or a life-altering challenge. 13 b. The program shall not be located on a clinical, medical, 14 or mental health facilityâs campus. 15 c. Each program shall operate independently of other medical 16 clinics and behavioral health clinics. 17 d. At least fifty-one percent of the board of directors 18 for the program shall be comprised of individuals who have a 19 history of living with a psychiatric condition or a behavioral 20 health condition, or who have experienced a life-altering 21 challenge. 22 e. If the program offers clinical mental health services, 23 the clinical mental health services must constitute less than 24 ten percent of the total services offered by the program. 25 2. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 26 to administer this section. 27